Utah statutes.
34-20-6.   Labor relations board -- Rules and regulations.

The board shall have authority from time to time to make, amend and rescind such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. Such rules and regulations shall be effective upon publication in the manner in which the board shall prescribe.

